Wyoming, session 2025, HB0053.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-112 is amended to read:

1-39-112. Liability; peace officers.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, a governmental entity is liable for damages
HB0053

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0282
resulting from tortious conduct of peace officers while
acting within the scope of their duties.

(b) No governmental entity shall be liable for
damages to a criminal suspect resulting from a peace
officer's negligent investigation while acting within the
scope of the peace officer's duties.

Section 2. The legislature recognizes the inherent
challenges that peace officers will face when investigating
criminal offenses while owing a duty of care to suspects of
criminal offenses to conduct a criminal investigation in a
non-negligent manner. This act is intended to abrogate the
opinion and holding of the Wyoming supreme court in
Palm-Egle v. Briggs, 2024 WY 31, 545 P.3d 828 (Wyo. 2024)
and provide that governmental entities shall not be liable
to criminal suspects for damages resulting from peace
officers negligently investigating crimes within the scope
of their duties.

Section 3. This act applies to all claims under the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act that are based on a
transaction or occurrence that occurs on and after the
HB0053

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0282
effective date of this act. For purposes of this section, a
"transaction" includes an act, error or omission.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0053